Alaska statutes. Title 13. Decedents’ Estates, Guardianships, Transfers, Trusts, and Health Care Decisions.
Article 1. Short Title, Construction, General Provisions.

Sec. 13.06.005.
Short title.

AS 13.06
—
AS 13.36 shall be known and may be cited as the Uniform Probate Code.

History.

(§ 1 ch 78 SLA 1972)

Sec. 13.06.010.
Purposes; rule of construction.

AS 13.06 — AS 13.36 shall be liberally construed and applied to promote their underlying purposes and policies.

The underlying purposes and policies of AS 13.06 — AS 13.36 are to

simplify and clarify the law concerning the affairs of decedents, missing persons, protected persons, minors, and incapacitated persons;

discover and make effective the intent of a decedent in distribution of the decedent’s property;

promote a speedy and efficient system for liquidating the estate of the decedent and making distribution to the decedent’s successors;

facilitate use and enforcement of certain trusts; and

make uniform the law among the various jurisdictions.

History.

(§ 1 ch 78 SLA 1972)

Sec. 13.06.015.
Supplementary general principles of law applicable.

Unless displaced by the particular provisions of AS 13.06
— AS 13.36, the principles of law and equity supplement those provisions.

History.

(§ 1 ch 78 SLA 1972)

Sec. 13.06.020.
Severability.

If any provision of AS 13.06 — AS 13.36 or their application to any person or circumstances is held invalid, the invalidity does not affect other provisions or applications of AS 13.06 — AS 13.36 that can be given effect without the invalid provision or application, and to this end the provisions of AS 13.06 — AS 13.36 are declared to be severable.

History.

(§ 1 ch 78 SLA 1972)

Sec. 13.06.025.
Construction against implied repeal.

AS 13.06
—
AS 13.36 are intended to provide a unified coverage of their subject matter.
No part of AS 13.06
—
AS 13.36 may be impliedly repealed by subsequent legislation if it can reasonably be avoided.

History.

(§ 1 ch 78 SLA 1972)

Sec. 13.06.030.
Effect of fraud and evasion; limitations.

Whenever fraud has been perpetrated in connection with any proceeding or in any statement filed under AS 13.06 — AS 13.36 or if fraud is used to avoid or circumvent the provisions or purposes of AS 13.06
—
AS 13.36, any person injured thereby may obtain appropriate relief against the perpetrator of the fraud or restitution from any person, other than a bona fide purchaser, benefiting from the fraud, whether innocent or not.
Any proceeding must be commenced within two years after the discovery of the fraud, but no proceeding may be brought against one not a perpetrator of the fraud later than five years after the time of commission of the fraud. This section has no bearing on remedies relating to fraud practiced on a decedent during the decedent’s lifetime that affects the succession of the decedent’s estate.

History.

(§ 1 ch 78 SLA 1972)

Sec. 13.06.035.
Evidence of death or status.

In addition to the Alaska Rules of Evidence, the following rules relating to a determination of death and status apply:

death occurs when an individual has sustained either irreversible cessation of circulatory and respiratory functions or irreversible cessation of all functions of the entire brain, including the brain stem; a determination of death shall be made under accepted medical standards;

a certified or authenticated copy of a death certificate purporting to be issued by an official or agency of the place where the death purportedly occurred is prima facie evidence of the fact, place, date, and time of death and the identity of the decedent;

a certified or authenticated copy of a record or report of a governmental agency, domestic or foreign, that an individual is missing, detained, dead, or alive is prima facie evidence of the status and of the dates, circumstances, and places disclosed by the record or report;

in the absence of prima facie evidence of death under (2) or (3) of this section, the fact of death may be established by clear and convincing evidence, including circumstantial evidence;

an individual whose death is not established under (1) — (4) of this section and who is absent for a continuous period of five years, during which the individual has not been heard from, and whose absence is not satisfactorily explained after diligent search or inquiry, is presumed to be dead; the individual’s death is presumed to have occurred at the end of the period unless there is sufficient evidence for determining that death occurred earlier;

in the absence of evidence disputing the time of death stated on a document described in (2) or (3) of this section, a document described in (2) or (3) of this section that states a time of death 120 hours or more after the time of death of another individual, however the time of death of the other individual is determined, establishes by clear and convincing evidence that the individual survived the other individual by at least 120 hours.

History.

(§ 1 ch 78 SLA 1972; am § 1 ch 1 SLA 1987; am § 1 ch 75 SLA 1996)

Editor’s notes. —

Section 19, ch. 75, SLA 1996, provides, in regard to the amendment of this section by § 1, ch. 75, SLA 1996, as follows: “(a) Except as otherwise provided in (b) of this section or in this Act,

“(1) this Act applies to the governing instruments executed by decedents dying on or after January 1, 1997;

“(2) this Act applies to a proceeding in court pending on or begun on or after January 1, 1997, regardless of the time of the death of the decedent, except to the extent that in the opinion of the court the former procedure should be made applicable in a particular case in the interest of justice or because of the infeasibility of applying the procedures of this Act;

“(3) an act done before January 1, 1997, in any proceeding and an accrued right are not impaired by this Act; if a right is acquired, extinguished, or barred upon the expiration of a prescribed period of time that began to run under a statute before January 1, 1997, the provisions of the statute apply to that right on and after January 1, 1997;

“(4) a rule of construction or presumption provided in this Act, applies to governing instruments executed before January 1, 1997, unless there is a clear indication of a contrary intent.

“(b) AS

13.33.301

,

13.33.302

,

13.33.303

,

13.33.304

,

13.33.305

,

13.33.306

,

13.33.307

,

13.33.308

,

13.33.309

, and

13.33.310

, enacted by sec. 12 of this Act, apply to registrations of securities in beneficiary form made before, on, or after January 1, 1997, by decedents dying on or after January 1, 1997.

“(c) In this section, ‘court,’ ‘governing instrument,’ and ‘proceeding’ have the meanings given in AS

13.06.050

, amended by sec. 2 of this Act.”

Sec. 13.06.040.
Acts by holder of general power.

For the purpose of granting consent or approval with regard to the acts or accounts of a personal representative or trustee, including relief from liability or penalty for failure to post bond, to register a trust, or to perform other duties, and for purposes of consenting to modification or termination of a trust or to deviation from its terms, the sole holder or all co-holders of a presently exercisable general power of appointment, including one in the form of a power of amendment or revocation, are considered to act for beneficiaries to the extent their interests, as objects, takers in default, or otherwise, are subject to the power.

History.

(§ 1 ch 78 SLA 1972)